src/pp-eng-lex.txt
! The Udmurt postposition
! Some of them are indeclinable, others are decline in a various number of 
! local cases.

LEXICON PP ! These are the indeclieable ones 
+P: #;

LEXICON Preposition
aboard  PP ;
about  PP ;
above  PP ;
across  PP ;
after  PP ;
against  PP ;
along  PP ;
amid  PP ;
among  PP ;
anti  PP ;
around  PP ;
as  PP ;
at  PP ;
before  PP ;
behind  PP ;
below  PP ;
beneath  PP ;
beside  PP ;
besides  PP ;
between  PP ;
beyond  PP ;
but  PP ;
by  PP ;
concerning  PP ;
considering  PP ;
despite  PP ;
down  PP ;
during  PP ;
except  PP ;
excepting  PP ;
excluding  PP ;
following  PP ;
for  PP ;
from  PP ;
  PP ;
  in  PP ;
inside  PP ;
into  PP ;
like  PP ;
minus  PP ;
near  PP ;
of  PP ;
off  PP ;
on  PP ;
onto  PP ;
opposite  PP ;
outside  PP ;
over  PP ;
past  PP ;
per  PP ;
plus  PP ;
regarding  PP ;
round  PP ;
save  PP ;
since  PP ;
than  PP ;
through  PP ;
to  PP ;
toward  PP ;
towards  PP ;
under  PP ;
underneath  PP ;
unlike  PP ;
until  PP ;
up  PP ;
upon  PP ;
versus  PP ;
via  PP ;
with  PP ;
within  PP ;
without   PP ;
